Utah statutes.
48-2a-1107 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Fees.

The division may charge and collect fees in accordance with the provisions of Section  63J-1-504.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

